West Virginia, session 2025, SB698.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 11D. THE MOTION PICTURE FAIR COMPETITION ACT. §47-11D-5. Open Captioning for Motion Pictures. (a) Exhibitors of motion pictures who operate six or more theaters in more than one location in this state shall provide open captioning during at least two showings per week of each motion picture that is produced and offered with open captioning. (b) Upon request, audio description shall be provided for any motion picture that is produced and offered with audio description. (c) Notwithstanding any section of this code to the contrary, no exhibitor may be required to purchase new equipment in order to comply with the requirements set forth in this section where doing so would result in an undue burden to the exhibitor or a fundamental alteration of the theater.  (d) The requirements set forth in this section do not apply to drive-in movie theater.